Maine, session 132, LD593.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Land for Maine's Future Z162
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for eligible expenditures and other authorized
purposes in accordance with the provisions of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section
6203-D.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000,000 $10,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,000,000 $10,000,000